dictsource/smj_rules
// SMJ translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

//     _)  a         // "a" at the start of a word
//         a (CC     // "a" followed by two consonants
//         a (C%     // "a" followed by a double consonant (the same letter twice)
//         a (/%     // "a" followed by a percent sign
//     %C) a         // "a" preceded by a double consonants

//     @@)  bi      // "bi" preceded by at least two syllables
//     @@a) bi      // "bi" preceded by at least 2 syllables and following 'a'

// START SMJ HERE

// groups

//.L01 i j	// used in palatalization rules

.L01 b d g k p t // Plosives

.L02 r l j v // Sonorants

//.L02 b d f g h j l m n r s v

//.L03 l m n r

//.L04 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v õ ä ö ü

//.L05 a e i l m n o r u õ ä ö ü


// Epenthetic vowels in Q3 consonant clusters
// r l j v followed by homorganic consonants (geminates)
// barggo, dárbbo, tjoarvve, girjje, álggo, galbba, gålmmå, dálvve, nijbbe, bievdde

// separate rules for all cons. clusters and vowel nucleai?
//       a (L02%C     // possible to generalize?
//       A) rgg	     r@^g // Any vowel + schwaa - more general?

//Orthographically homonymous Q3: f, l, m, n, nj, ń, ñ, ŋ, r, s, sj, v
// After numeral 1 -- Q3; after any numeral <1 -- Q2?
// akta @) ff	ff:
// Word order? -- Impossible to have a syntactic disambiguator in Espeak to recognize homonymous sg.nom & sg.gen forms...
// OR if adjusted orthography would be used, e.g.: f'f/fff	ff:
// Vowel compensation/readjustment: V1 and V2 longest in Q1, gradually decreasing in length, but differences very small/not significant. 




.group a
//          a          A
          a (@       A // back vowel
       @) a          a:
          artihkal   ar.t'ihkAl
     %CC) a          A // short after Q3 consonant/cluster

.group á
     %CC) á          a // short after Q3 consonant/cluster
	  á (@       A: //
       @) á	     a: // in 2nd syll
       C) á	     A: // after Q1 (single) consonant
       
.group ä
	  ä (@       &
	  ä          &: //
//	  ä          i& // in Sweden
	  ä          e& // in Sweden
	  
.group æ // same as ä
	  æ (@       &	  
	  æ          &: //
//	  æ          i& // in Sweden
	  æ          e& // in Sweden
     %CC) æ          & // short after Q3 consonant/cluster
	  
.group å
          å          O
       @) å          O: // in 2nd syll
     %CC) å          O // short after Q3 consonant/cluster
          
.group b
          b          p
       A) b (A       b // voiced in an intervocalic position
          bb         b: // voiced within a geminate
          bussa      p'u-s:A // Scandinavian loanword
       
.group c
          c          ts
          
.group d
          d          t
          dal        dAl
       A) d (A       d // voiced in an intervocalic position
          dd         d:
          dj         c // palatal plosive
       A) dj (A      J\ // voiced palatal plosive between vowels
       A) ddj (A     J\: // voiced palatal plosive between vowels
          dts        dz // [d͡z]
          dtj        dZ // [d͡ʒ]
          
.group e
          e (@       E: // open-mid
          e (_       iE  // open 2nd syll
       @) e          iE // in 2nd syll
          e          E // other environments
          
.group f
          f          f
          ff         f:
//  akta @) ff (A      ff: // (Q3/sg.nom when with numeral 1)
          
.group g
          g          k
       A) g (A       g // voiced in an intervocalic position          
          gg         g:
          
.group h
          h          h
          hk         hk
          hkk        k: // [h] not audible in Q3 cons. cluster
          hp         hp
          hpp        p: // [h] not audible in Q3 cons. cluster
          ht         ht
          htt        t: // [h] not audible in Q3 cons. cluster
          hts        hts
          htts       h:ts
          htj        htS
          httj       ht:S
          
.group i
          i          i: // can be long as well?
          ie (@      iE
     %CC) i          i // short after Q3 consonant
          
.group j
          j          j
          ja         ja
       i) jbb        jIb
          journalissta         Sur.nal'isstA

.group k
          k          k
          k (á       kh // Aspirated in Scandinavian loanwords, like this?
          káffa      kh'A:f:A
          kásus      kh'A:su-s
          kássa      kh'A:S:A
          kk         k:
	  
.group l
          l	     l // Can be a copula itself
          ll	     l:
//  akta @) ll (A      ll: // (Q3/sg.nom when with numeral 1)   
          
       á) lgg	     lAg // Q3
       a) lbb	     lab // Q3
       u) lpp	     lub // Q3
       á) lmm	     lAm // Q3
       á) lvv	     lAv // Q3
          
.group m
          m          m
          mm         m:
//  akta @) mm (A      mm: // (Q3/sg.nom when with numeral 1)      
    	      
.group n
           n          n
           nj         n_j
           nnj        n_j:
//   akta @) nnj (A     nn_j: // (Q3/sg.nom when with numeral 1)  
 
 
.group ñ
          ñ          N
          ññ         N:
//  akta @) ññ (A      NN: // (Q3/sg.nom when with numeral 1)      
           
.group ń
          ń          N
          ńń         N:
//  akta @) ńń (A      NN: // (Q3/sg.nom when with numeral 1)      
           
.group ŋ
          ŋ          N
          ŋŋ         N:
//  akta @) ŋŋ (A      NN: // (Q3/sg.nom when with numeral 1)      
           
.group o
          o          oO
       @) o          uo
          oa         ua //
          oa (@      oA //
         
.group ö
     %CC) ö          Y
          ö          Y: //
          
.group ø
     %CC) ø          Y
          ø          Y: //
          
.group p
          p          p
          p (á       ph // Aspirated in Scandinavian loanwords
          pp         p:
          parlamænnta         par.lAm'&ntA

.group r
          r          r
          rd         rt
          rl         rl
//          rl         l. // Retroflex. in Scandinavian loanwords
          rn         rn
//          rn         n. // Retroflex. in Scandinavian loanwords
          rt         rt
//          rt         t. // Retroflex. in Scandinavian loanwords

       a) rgg	     rag // Q3
       e) rgg	     reg // Q3
       æ) rgg	     r&g // Q3
       a) rvv	     rav // Q3        
       á) rbb	     rAb // Q3
       i) rjj	     rij // Q3
       u) rŋŋ	     ruN // Q3
       
          rr         r:
//  akta @) rr (A      rr: // (Q3/sg.nom when with numeral 1)           

.group s
          s          s
          ss         s:
//  akta @) ss (A      ss: // (Q3/sg.nom when with numeral 1)      
       
          sj         S
          ssj        S: // Q2 or Q3        
//  akta @) ssj (A     SS: // (Q3/sg.nom when with numeral 1)               
          
.group t
          t          t
          t (á       th // Aspirated in Scandinavian loanwords
          t (_       ht // at the end of a word
          tt         t:
          tj         tS // voiceless alveo-palatal fricative in Sweden
          ts         ts // voiceless alveo-palatal fricative in Sweden e.g. <subtsas>
          tts        ts:

.group u
          u          u
          uo (@      uo
//          u          u: //
//          u          U- //
//          u          u- // in newish Scand. loanwords like <komuvnna>

// List some of most common scand. loanwords?

.group v
          v          v
          vv         v:
     L01) v          f // before a plosive
          v (_       P // in the end of a word, e.g. 1sg suffix

       e) vdd        ved // Q3
       i) vdd        vid // Q3
       å) vdd        vOd // Q3
       
//  akta @) vv (A      vv: // (Q3/sg.nom when with numeral 1)               

.group w
          w          v

.group x
          x          ks
          xx         k:s
          
.group y
          y          y

.group z
          z          ts
          zz         t:s      // pizza
       K) zh         Z

 
